Florida, session 2026, HB545.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (3) of section 327.75, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
327.75 Watercraft Energy Source Freedom Act.—
(3) PROHIBITION ON RESTRICTIONS BASED ON ENERGY SOURCE.—
(a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a state
agency, municipality, governmental entity, or county may not
restrict the use or sale of a watercraft based on the energy
source used to power the watercraft, including an energy source
used for propulsion or used for powering other functions of the
watercraft.
(b) Paragraph (a) does not apply to any lake, reservoir,
drainage pond, or a detention or retention pond necessary for
the preservation or protection of such waters from
contamination.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb545-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 545 2026
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb545-00